Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30 INCOME TAX
§ 63-3072. Credits and refunds.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (b), (c) and (h) of this section, where there has been an overpayment of the tax imposed by the provisions of this chapter, the amount of such overpayment shall be credited against any tax administered by the state tax commission which tax is then due from the taxpayer, and any balance of such excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer.

Except in regard to amounts withheld as provided in section 63-3035, 63-3035A or 63-3036, Idaho Code, or amounts paid as estimated payments under section 63-3036A, Idaho Code, or amounts paid as backup withholding under section 63-3036B, Idaho Code, a claim for credit or refund of tax, penalties, or interest paid shall be made within the later of three (3) years of the due date of the return, without regard to extensions, or three (3) years from the date the return was filed. However, with regard to remittances received with an extension of time to file, or a tentative return, a claim for credit or refund of such remittances shall be made within three (3) years from the due date of the return without regard to extensions.

With regard to amounts withheld as provided in section 63-3035, 63-3035A or 63-3036, Idaho Code, or amounts paid as estimated payments under section 63-3036A, Idaho Code, or amounts paid as backup withholding under section 63-3036B, Idaho Code, a claim for credit or refund shall be made within three (3) years from the due date of the return, without regard to extensions, for the taxable year in respect to which the tax was withheld or paid. However, with regard to an individual who is entitled to an extension of time as provided in section 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, the three (3) year period provided in this subsection for claiming a credit or refund shall be extended by the number of days disregarded under section 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, when Idaho taxable income and/or tax credits for any taxable year have been adjusted as a result of a final federal determination, the period of limitations for claiming a refund or credit of tax, penalties, or interest shall be reopened and shall not expire until the later of one (1) year from the date of delivery of the final federal determination to the taxpayer by the internal revenue service, three (3) years from the due date of the return, without regard to extensions, or three (3) years from the date the return was filed. For purposes of this subsection, the term “final federal determination” shall mean the final resolution of all issues which were adjusted by the internal revenue service. When the final federal determination is submitted, the taxpayer shall also submit copies of all schedules and written explanations provided by the internal revenue service. Upon the expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsections (b) and (h) of this section, only those specific items of income, deductions, gains, losses or credits which were adjusted in the final federal determination shall be subject to adjustment for purposes of recomputing Idaho income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and the effect of such adjustments on Idaho allocations and apportionments.

If a claim for credit or refund relates to an overpayment attributable to a net operating loss carryback incurred in a taxable year commencing in 2012 or earlier, or a capital loss carryback, in lieu of the period of limitations prescribed in subsection (b) of this section, the period shall be that period which ends with the expiration of the fifteenth day of the fortieth month following the end of the taxable year of the net operating loss or capital loss which results in such carryback. Claims for net operating losses carried back from taxable years commencing after 2012 shall be made pursuant to section 63-3022, Idaho Code.

If an adjustment, which was made within the period of limitations as provided in this section, affects the amount of tax credit, net operating loss, or capital loss, claimed in a taxable year other than the tax year in which the adjustment is made, then adjustments to the credit, net operating loss, or capital loss, claimed in such other tax year may be made and a claim for credit or refund of tax, penalties or interest may be made even though such claim would otherwise be barred under the provisions of this section.

In the case of a duplicate return filed under section 63-217(1)(b), Idaho Code, the limitations under this section shall be the later of one (1) year from the filing of the duplicate return or the date otherwise applicable under this section.

Prior to the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for credit or refund of any tax imposed by the provisions of this chapter, both the state tax commission or its delegate or deputy and the taxpayer may consent in writing to extend such period of time. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon. When a pass-through entity extends the period of limitations in accordance with the provisions of this subsection the period of limitations for the other taxpayers is automatically extended for the same period for the purpose of claiming a credit or refund of tax, penalties or interest by the other taxpayers reflecting the pass-through entity adjustments.

The expiration of the period of limitations as provided in this section shall be suspended for the time period between the issuance by the state tax commission of a notice under either section 63-3045 or 63-3065, Idaho Code, and the final resolution of any proceeding resulting from the notice.

Appeal of a state tax commission decision denying in whole or in part a claim for credit or refund shall be made in accordance with and within the time limits prescribed in section 63-3049, Idaho Code.

For purposes of this section, “return” includes a notice of deficiency determination issued by the state tax commission when no return was filed by the taxpayer. Such a return is deemed filed on the date the taxes determined by the state tax commission are assessed.

§ 63-3073. Interest on refunds and credits.

Upon the allowance of a credit or refund of any tax erroneously or illegally assessed or collected, or of any penalty collected without authority, or of any sum which was excessive or in any manner wrongfully collected, interest shall be allowed and paid on the amount of such credit or refund at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, from the date such tax, penalty, or sum was paid or from the date the return was required to be filed, whichever date is the later, to the date of the allowance of the refund, or in the case of a credit, to the due date of the amount against which the credit is taken; provided, however, that in case of a voluntary and unrequested payment in excess of actual tax liability, no interest shall be allowed when such excess is refunded or credited.

Interest on refunds resulting from net operating loss carryback claims or from capital loss carryback claims shall be computed from the last day of the taxable year in which the net operating loss or capital loss arises.

§ 63-3074. Actions against state of Idaho.

The state tax commission may be made a party defendant in a civil action by any person aggrieved under this chapter or any other chapter in which this section is expressly incorporated by reference by the unlawful seizure or sale of his property, or in any suit for refund or to recover an overpayment, but only the state of Idaho shall be responsible for any final money judgment secured against the state tax commission, and said judgment shall be paid or satisfied out of the state refund fund created by section 63-3067, Idaho Code. No seizure or sale shall be considered unlawful if it occurs in the collection of any deficiency which was included in the person’s tax return or asserted in a notice of deficiency determination pursuant to section 63-3045 or 63-3629, Idaho Code, or in a jeopardy assessment pursuant to the provisions of section 63-3629 or 63-3065, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3075. Penalties.

Any person required under this act to pay any tax, or required by law or regulations made under authority thereof to make a return, keep any records, or supply any information, for the purposes of the computation, assessment, or collection of any tax imposed by this act, who wilfully fails to pay such tax, make such returns, keep such records, or supply such information at the time or times required by law or regulations, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than three hundred dollars ($300), or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or both.

Any person required under this act to collect, account for and pay over any tax imposed by this act, who wilfully fails to collect or truthfully account for and pay over such tax, and any person who wilfully attempts in any manner to evade or defeat any tax imposed by this act or the payment thereof, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or imprisoned for not more than five (5) years or both.

Any person who wilfully aids or assists in, or procures, counsels, or advises, the preparation or presentation under, or in connection with any matter arising under, this act, of a false or fraudulent return, affidavit, claim, or document, shall (whether or not such falsity or fraud is with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present such return, affidavit, claim, or document) be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or both.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 19-402 and 19-403, Idaho Code, no person shall be prosecuted, tried, or punished for any of the offenses contained in subsections (a), (b), or (c) of this section, unless the complaint or indictment is filed within six (6) years from the commission of the offense.

§ 63-3076. Penalty for divulging information.

In regard to the administration of the taxes imposed by this chapter or by any other statute to which this section and section 63-3077, Idaho Code, expressly apply:

No state tax commissioner, deputy, or any clerk, agent, contractor or employee, or any centralized state computer facility employee or any person formerly employed in any such position shall knowingly divulge or make known to any person in any manner any tax return or tax information whatsoever obtained directly or indirectly by him in the discharge of his duties, except as provided by statute, court order or rules of the state tax commission promulgated under this section or section 63-3077, Idaho Code.

In any action or proceeding brought for the collection, remission, cancellation or refund of the whole or any part of a tax imposed under the provisions of this chapter, or for enforcing the penalties prescribed for making false or fraudulent returns, any and all information contained in such returns and tax information may be furnished or made accessible to the officers or representatives of the state or county charged with the duty of investigating, prosecuting or defending the same; and all such returns and tax information and the statements and correspondence relating thereto may be produced in evidence in any action or proceeding, civil or criminal, directly pertaining to such returns or the tax imposed on the basis of such return. In addition, the state tax commission may provide information in its possession to a law enforcement agency or prosecutor pursuant to the investigation or prosecution of an offense under section 18-915, 18-1353, 18-1353A, 18-1354, 18-1355 or 18-6710, Idaho Code, when the victim of such an offense is, or at the time of the action was, a member, employee or agent of the state tax commission.

A copy of all or any portion of a federal return, or information reflected on such federal return, which may be attached to an Idaho return, or otherwise come into the possession of any commissioner, deputy, clerk, agent, contractor or employee, or any employee of a centralized state computer facility, shall not be disclosed in any manner whatsoever other than as authorized by this section.

Any officer, agent, clerk, contractor or employee who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years. Such officer, agent, clerk, contractor or employee upon such conviction shall also forfeit his office, employment or contract and shall be incapable of holding any public office in this state for a period of two (2) years thereafter. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the state tax commission’s ability to take disciplinary actions authorized in chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.

As used in this section and section 63-3077, Idaho Code, the term:

“Return” means any of the following whether required, provided for, or permitted by any statute administered by the state tax commission that is filed with the state tax commission by, for, or with respect to any person:

Any tax or information return;

Declaration of estimated tax;

Claim for refund;

Any amendment or supplement thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments or lists that are supplemental to, or part of, the return.
(b) “Tax information” means:

A taxpayer’s identity;

The nature, source or amount of a taxpayer’s income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability, tax withheld, deficiencies, overassessments or tax payments;

The status of the processing or investigation of the taxpayer’s liability;

Any other data received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to or collected by the state tax commission with respect to a return or with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of any person pursuant to the laws administered by the state tax commission for any tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, other imposition or offense;

Any part of a written determination, or documents relating to a written determination, that is not open to public inspection; and

Information filed with, or furnished to, the state tax commission by or for the taxpayer to whom the information relates that is not otherwise public information.

§ 63-3077. Information furnished to certain officials.

The state tax commission, under such rules as it may prescribe, may disclose tax returns or tax information to:

The commissioner of internal revenue of the United States or his delegate or the financial management services of the department of the treasury of the United States; or

The proper officer of any state imposing a tax similar to a tax to which this section applies or the multistate tax commission or its delegate or the governing entity of the international fuels tax agreement or its delegate;

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter as to secrecy, any duly constituted committee of either branch of the state legislature shall have the right to inspect returns upon request.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a taxpayer, or his authorized representative, upon proper identification, from inspecting or obtaining a copy of his own tax returns or tax information or authorizing, in writing, the disclosure of information to a third party.

Any resident or part-year resident individual taxpayer making an income tax return, shall furnish the state tax commission with the location of any residential property owned by the taxpayer and occupied by the taxpayer as his primary dwelling place on the first day of January of the year following the year to which the tax return relates. The state tax commission is hereby authorized and empowered to deliver to the county assessor of any county of the state of Idaho information relating to a taxpayer’s place of residence or domicile. The information may be used by county assessors and boards of equalization to assist in determining the validity of any homeowner’s entitlement to the exemption provided in section 63-602G, Idaho Code. Information disclosed to county officials under this subsection may be used only to determine the validity of any homeowner’s entitlement to the exemption provided in section 63-602G, Idaho Code, and is not otherwise subject to public disclosure.

The state tax commission additionally is authorized to utilize any centralized state computer facility.

Nothing in this section or section 63-3076, Idaho Code, shall require the state tax commission to disclose information not required to be disclosed under the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, or prevent the state tax commission from disclosing the current validity of any permit or license issued by the state tax commission or information that is otherwise publicly available.

of any taxpayer making or who may be required to make returns, with the state tax commission or may furnish to such officer or his authorized representative an abstract or copy of any tax return or tax information or any information disclosed by the report of any audit or investigation relating to any taxpayer; but such permission shall be granted or information furnished to such officer or his representatives only if the statutes of the United States or such other state, as the case may be, grant substantially similar privileges to the state tax commission.

§ 63-3077A. Agreements for exchange of information and joint administration with department of labor.

The state tax commission and the department of labor may enter into a written agreement for exchange of information relating to tax laws administered by the state tax commission and the employment security law administered by the department of labor. Any information so exchanged shall be confidential information in the hands of the recipient thereof and may be used only for the following:

Determining whether the person to whom the information relates may have an undischarged duty or liability under the employment security law or the tax laws administered by the state tax commission, the amount of such liability, the person’s whereabouts, social security number, and information helpful in collecting any liability due.

Administering any joint agreement between the department of labor and the state tax commission relating to employment security taxes and income tax withholding for the common registration of employers, common tax reporting forms, centralized filing and processing of forms.

Administration of the state directory of new hires provided in chapter 16, title 72, Idaho Code.

No such information shall be public information unless it is used in the course of a judicial proceeding arising under the employment security law or the tax laws administered by the state tax commission.

An agreement made pursuant to this section may provide for the offset of any refunds owed to any person by either party to the agreement against any tax liability, overpayment of benefits liability, and any penalties and interest thereon owed to either party to the agreement. No offset may be made unless the liability against which it is applied is final, without any further right on the part of the person owing the liability to either administrative or judicial review.

§ 63-3077B. Agreements for exchange of information with industrial commission.

The state tax commission and the industrial commission may enter into a written agreement for exchange of information relating to persons, firms, corporations, partnerships or associations who are or may be conducting business operations in this state. Such information shall be confidential to the recipient and may be used only for purposes of determining whether the person to whom the information relates may have an undischarged duty or obligation under the tax laws administered by the tax commission or may have an obligation to secure worker’s compensation insurance coverage under the laws administered by the industrial commission. No such information shall be public information unless it is used in the course of a judicial proceeding arising under the laws of this state. The information provided by the tax commission shall be limited to the following:

Names of individuals operating the business.

The business name.

The mailing address.

The physical location of the business.

The effective date of the withholding tax permit.

The contact person.

The telephone number of the contact person.

§ 63-3077C. Agreement for exchange of information with department of fish and game.

The state tax commission and the department of fish and game may enter into a written agreement for exchange of information relating to an individual’s place of residence or domicile. Such information shall be confidential to the recipient and may be used by the department of fish and game only for purposes of determining whether a person who has purchased a resident fish and game license and to whom the information relates is entitled to purchase a resident fish and game license, or by the state tax commission for determining if the individual is complying with laws relating to taxation. No such information shall be public information unless it is used in the course of a judicial proceeding arising under the laws of this state. The information provided by the state tax commission shall be limited to the following:

Identification of an individual.

An individual’s home address.

An individual’s residency status.

§ 63-3077D. Agreement for collection of tax.

The state tax commission may enter into agreements with the United States secretary of the treasury through the internal revenue service or the financial management service of the department of the treasury of the United States providing for the mutual offset of any refunds or other amount payable by either party against liabilities owed to the other party to the agreement. Any such agreement shall require that no offset may be made unless the liability against which it applies is final, without any further right on the part of the person owing the liability to either administrative review or judicial review.

No refunds from this state shall be available for offset against any federal debt:

Until any debts subject to offset that are owed to this state or agency thereof have been satisfied; or

During any time when a reciprocal program for offset from federal refunds for tax debts owing to this state is not in effect.

§ 63-3077E. Agreements for exchange of information with the state treasurer.

The state tax commission and the state treasurer may enter into a written agreement for exchange of information relating to persons, firms, corporations, partnerships or associations who are or may be conducting business operations in this state or who may be the owners of unclaimed property reported to the state treasurer. Such information shall be confidential to the recipient and may be used only for purposes of administering the provisions of the unclaimed property act in chapter 5, title 14, Idaho Code. No such information shall be public information unless it is used in the course of a judicial proceeding arising under the laws of this state. The information provided by the tax commission may include the following:

Names and addresses of businesses within this state.

The names and addresses of individuals or entities identified as owners or potential owners of unclaimed property in the custody of the state treasurer.

Taxpayer identifying numbers.

§ 63-3077F. Information furnished to certain individuals.

In the case of suspected identity theft involving the use of a social security number or other tax identification number, the state tax commission may disclose to the true owner of a social security number or other tax identification number any tax return or tax return information that identifies the individual using the true owner’s stolen social security number or other tax identification number.

A disclosure shall be made only after receipt of a valid written information request from the victim of identity theft and would include only information to allow the victim to identify the individual using the stolen social security number or other tax identification number. Any disclosure to the true owner shall not include financial information on the tax returns or other tax information.

§ 63-3077G. Agreement for exchange of information with the Idaho department of correction.

The state tax commission and the Idaho department of correction may enter into a written agreement for exchange of information relating to an individual’s incarceration status and whether that individual has claimed the Idaho food tax credit pursuant to section 63-3024A, Idaho Code. Such information shall be confidential to the recipient and may be used by the Idaho department of correction and the state tax commission only for purposes of determining whether an incarcerated person erroneously claimed the food tax credit in violation of section 63-3024A(7), Idaho Code. No such information shall be public unless it is used in the course of a judicial proceeding arising under the laws of this state. The information provided by the state tax commission shall be limited to name, date of birth, social security number, an indication as to whether the food tax credit was claimed under that person’s name or social security number for a particular taxable year and incarceration status during the year at issue.

§ 63-3077H. Agreement for exchange of information with the Idaho department of health and welfare.

The state tax commission and the Idaho department of health and welfare may enter into a written agreement for exchange of information relating to an individual’s receipt of federal food stamp benefits and whether that individual has claimed the Idaho food tax credit pursuant to section 63-3024A, Idaho Code. Such information shall be confidential to the recipient and may be used by the Idaho department of health and welfare and the state tax commission only for purposes of determining whether a person who was receiving federal food stamp benefits erroneously claimed the food tax credit in violation of section 63-3024A(6), Idaho Code. No such information shall be public unless it is used in the course of a judicial proceeding arising under the laws of this state. Any information disclosed by the Idaho department of health and welfare pursuant to the provisions of this section must be disclosed in compliance with the privacy act of 1974, 5 U.S.C. section 552a, applicable federal law or regulations regarding public assistance programs and any applicable state law or regulation.

§ 63-3078. Failure to collect and pay over tax, or attempt to evade of [or] defeat tax.

Any person required to collect, truthfully account for and pay over any tax imposed by this title who wilfully fails to collect such tax, or truthfully account for and pay over such tax, or wilfully attempts in any manner to evade or defeat any such tax or the payment thereof, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be liable to a penalty equal to the total amount of the tax evaded, or not collected, or not accounted for or paid over. No penalty shall be imposed under this or other Idaho Code sections for any offense to which this section is applicable except and to the extent that such would be imposed when this section is interpreted in a manner similar to the interpretation given to section 6672(a) of the internal revenue code.

§ 63-3079. Franchise tax not repealed.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as repealing any law requiring corporations and other forms of associations to pay an annual franchise tax based on their income or on premiums collected or according to the amount of business transacted.

§ 63-3080. Not a property tax.

For the purpose of raising revenue the taxable income required to be shown on returns under this act and taken as a basis for determining the tax hereunder shall not be classified or held or construed to be property.

§ 63-3081. Transition provisions. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3082. Additional tax required when filing income tax return.

Every person required to file an income tax return shall pay a tax of ten dollars ($10.00). For this purpose, a husband and wife filing a joint return shall be deemed a single person. This tax shall be in the nature of an excise tax upon the receipt of the income which requires the filing of such return.

A pass-through entity as defined in section 63-3006C, Idaho Code, shall also pay the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section for each individual included within section 63-3022L, Idaho Code, on the composite return.

For purposes of this section, a husband and wife filing a joint federal return may be deemed a single individual.

§ 63-3083. “Person” defined.

“Person” as used in sections 63-3082 through 63-3087, Idaho Code, means any individual, or entity required to file a return under section 63-3030, Idaho Code, unless all of the income or loss is distributed or otherwise reportable as a part of the taxable income of another taxpayer and the entity does not have any Idaho taxable income.

§ 63-3084. Tax additional to other income taxes.

The tax imposed by this act shall be in addition to any other income taxes imposed by the laws of this state.

§ 63-3085. Date tax due and payable.

The tax herein imposed shall become due and payable to the state tax commission of the state of Idaho on or before the 15th day of April following the close of a calendar year or on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of a fiscal year.

§ 63-3086. Persons exempt from tax.

This act shall not apply to any person who on the last day of his taxable year is blind or lawfully receiving public assistance payments from the state under title 56, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3087. Collection and enforcement.

The collection and enforcement procedures provided by the Idaho Income Tax Act, sections 63-3038 through 63-3040, 63-3042 through 63-3065A, 63-3071, 63-3075 and 63-3078, Idaho Code, shall apply and be available to the state tax commission for enforcement of the provisions of this act and collection of any amounts due under this act, and said sections shall, for this purpose, be considered part of this act and wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined as income tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in enforcement or collection under this act, be described as permanent building fund tax liens and proceedings.

§ 63-3088. Designation by individuals. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 3, § 2, effective January 1, 2010.

§ 63-3089. Designation of school districts. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3029P. Priority of credits.

§ 63-3029EE. Special credit available — New employees. [Null and void.]